Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Chapter 6 Savings and Loan Associations

Cross references. —

As to investing in bonds and other securities issued by University of Wyoming, see §

21-17-448

.

As to investing in community college bonds, see §

21-18-313

.

As authority of insurer to invest in savings accounts, see § 26-7-107(a)(xi).

As to the applicability of the Wyoming Money Transmitters Act to credit unions, see § 40-22-104(a)(iv).

Cited

in

Wyoming Trust & Mgt. v. Bonham, 694 P.2d 106,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 430

(Wyo. 1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d Banks §§ 4 to 7.

12 C.J.S. Building and Loan Associations § 1 et seq.